Hawaii statutes.
[§436M-8] Activation. No alarm system
shall be activated intentionally except: (1) to report an unauthorized
intrusion or the commission of an unlawful act; or (2) to test an installed
system with the prior knowledge and consent of the police; or (3) to permit an
alarm business to demonstrate a system to a prospective buyer or user. [L 1986,
c 134, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next